sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Závesné trenažéry > Závesné súpravy na celé telo: Preliezky; Celotelové popruhy
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Redskap för suspensionsträning > Helkroppssuspensionssatser: Klätterställningar; Helkroppsremmar
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Sangles de suspension > Kits de suspension complète: Aires de jeu; Sangles totales pour le corps
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Suspensjonstrenere > Opphengssett for hele kroppen: Jungle-gym; Hele kroppsstropper
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Suspension Trainer > Ganzkörper-Suspension-Kits: Klettergerüste; Ganzkörpergurte
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Attrezzi per allenamento in sospensione > Kit di sospensione per total body: Jungle Gyms; Cinghie per total body
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 悬挂训练设备 > 全身悬挂装备套件: 攀登架; 全身绑带
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > サスペンショントレーナー > フルボディ サスペンションキット: ジャングルジム; トータルボディストラップ
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Sistemas de entrenamiento en suspensión > Kits de suspensión de cuerpo completo: Gimnasios en la selva; Correas para todo el cuerpo
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > อุปกรณ์ฝึกประเภทสาย > ชุดฝึกประเภทสายแบบเต็มตัว: จังเกิลยิม; สายรัดร่างกายทั้งหมด
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 懸掛訓練繩 > 全身懸掛工具包: 兒童遊樂組; 全身帶
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Articole pentru antrenamente de suspensie > Seturi suspensie pentru tot corpul: Jungle Gyms; Curele pentru antrenament pentru tot corpul
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Suspenzijski trenažeri > Kompleti za suspenzijski trening: Vježbališta; Pojasevi za vježbanje za cijelo tijelo
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Kabamieji treniruokliai > Viso kūno kabamųjų treniruočių rinkiniai: Laipynės; Viso kūno treniruočių diržai
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Závěsné tréninkové systémy > Celotělové závěsné sady: Jungle Gym; Popruhy na celé tělo
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Pasy treningowe > Atlas do ćwiczeń: Jungle Gyms; Pasy do treningu
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Felfüggesztési trénerek > Teljes testes felfüggesztési készletek: Mászókák; Teljes testes pántok
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Suspension Trainers > Full Body Suspension Kits: Jungle Gyms; Total Body Straps
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Elastiktræning > Ophængssæt til hele kroppen: Stænger til armbøjninger; Hele kropsstropper
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 서스펜션 트레이너 > 전신 서스펜션 키트: 정글짐; 전신 스트랩
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Функциональные петли > Наборы для проработки всего тела: Функциональные петли с отдельными ремнями; Ремни для всего тела
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Suspensiontrainers > Suspensionkits voor het hele lichaam: Klimrekken; Bandjes voor het hele lichaam
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Ιμάντες αιώρησης για προπόνηση > Σετ πλήρους ανάρτησης σώματος: Συγκροτήματα από μπάρες για αναρρίχηση; Ιμάντες ολικής εκγύμνασης
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Suspensioharjoitteluvälineet > Koko kehon suspensiosetit: Kiipeilytelineet; Koko kehon hihnat
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Egzersiz Askıları > Tam Vücut Süspansiyon Kitleri: Orman Spor Salonları; Toplam Vücut Kayışları
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Equipamentos de treino de suspensão > Kits de suspensão para corpo inteiro: Jungle Gyms; Faixas para corpo inteiro
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Тренировъчни системи за окачване > Тренировъчни системи за окачване за цялото тяло: Многостранни силови уреди (Jungle Gym); Ремъци за цялото тяло
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Vadbeni trakovi > Kompleti vzmetenja za vadbo celotnega telesa: Večnamenske fitnes naprave; Trakovi za vadbo celotnega telesa
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Đai treo > Bộ sản phẩm treo toàn thân: Phòng tập thể dục trong rừng; Dây đeo toàn thân
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Fitas de suspensão > Kits de suspensão de corpo inteiro: Brinquedos de parque infantil; Correias de corpo inteiro